Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
452

MASSAGE

Section

452-1 Definitions

452-2 License required

452-3 Massage therapy establishments to be
licensed

452-4 Creation of state board; qualifications

452-5 Repealed

452-6 Powers and duties of the board

452-7, 8 Repealed

452-9 Records of board

452-10 Repealed

452-11 Assistance to board

452-12 Application for examination

452-13 Requisites for admission to examination
and licensing

of massage therapists and massage therapy

establishments

452-14 Examination

452-15 Licenses

452-16 Renewal of license; fees

452-17 Fees

452-18 Sanitary rule

452-19 Penalties

452-20 Repealed

452-21 To whom provisions in this chapter shall
not apply

452-22 Repealed

452-23 Advertising

452-24 Disciplinary actions

452-25 Right of injunction

452-26 Cumulative remedies

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1980, c 208, §2.

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Health care professionals, see chapter 451D.

Massage therapy establishments; National Human Trafficking
Resource Center hotline; posting requirement; penalty, see §371-20.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next